Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-3545
Hospital district; dissolution; resolution; winding up of affairs.

The board of directors shall file a certified copy of the resolution of dissolution with the county board of each of the counties in which any part of the district is situated, and thereupon the district shall be dissolved for all purposes, except for winding up its affairs. The board of directors shall be, ex officio, the governing body of any dissolved district, and it may perform all acts necessary to wind up the affairs of the district.

Laws 1959, c. 83, § 17, p. 379;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 23-343.36.